North Dakota, session 69, HB1259.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 1-08 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Year - round observance of standard time .
1. Under 15 U.S.C. 260(a), the state and all political subdivisions of the state are exempt
from the establishment of daylight saving time and must observe standard time year
round.
2. The official standard time for the portion of the state in the central time zone is six
hours slower than Greenwich time, based on the mean solar time of the ninetieth
degree of longitude west from Greenwich.
3. The official standard time for the portion of the state in the mountain time zone is
seven hours slower than Greenwich time, based on the mean solar time of the one
hundred and fifth degree of longitude west from Greenwich .
4. This section may not affect the standard time established by United States law
governing the movements of common carriers engaged in interstate commerce or the
time for performance of an act by an officer or department of the United States, as
established by a statute, lawful order, rule, or regulation of the United States or an
agency of the United States.
SECTION 2. REPEAL. Section 40-01-20 of the North Dakota Century Code is repealed.
Page No. 1 25.0767.02000